Hawaii, session 2025, HB1403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that geothermal resources can provide stable power and community benefits and are a viable alternative to biofuels.  In 2024, the legislature appropriated $6,000,000 for an integrated geothermal development plan to be administered by the Hawaii technology development corporation.  The governor subsequently reduced the appropriation to $3,000,000.  Through a partnership between the Hawaii technology development corporation and the university of Hawaii, work has already begun on an integrated geothermal development roadmap with the goal of developing the first utility-scale 50-100-megawatt power station on Hawaii island. Hawaii island holds the most promise for geothermal energy development.  All geothermal testing done in the State confirms that the largest and most reliable source of geothermal energy is located on Hawaii island.  Hawaii island is also the only island that has enough agricultural and pastoral land to meet the State's need for food self-sufficiency and security in the future. The legislature recognizes that an additional appropriation is needed to allow the Hawaii technology development corporation to continue the geothermal energy exploration currently underway.  Further funding would ensure that the Hawaii technology development corporation can oversee a development plan, administer an extensive community outreach program, and build on previous investigations by the department of Hawaiian home lands and other entities. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the exploration and identification of geothermal resources on Hawaii island. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $6,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the exploration and identification of geothermal resources on Hawaii island. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________